District of Columbia statutes.
23-1905

Definitions.

For purposes of this section,

(1)

The term “community” means a formal or informal association or group of people living, working, or attending school in the same place or neighborhood and sharing common interests arising from social, business, religious, governmental, scholastic, or recreational associations.

(1A)

The term “community impact statement” means a written statement that provides information about the social, financial, emotional, and physical effects of the defendant or crime on the community.

(1B)

The term “court” means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(2)

(A)

The term “victim” or “crime victim” means a person who or entity which has suffered direct physical, emotional, or pecuniary harm:

(i)

As a result of the commission of any felony or misdemeanor in violation of any criminal statute in the District of Columbia;

(ii)

While assisting lawfully to apprehend a person reasonably suspected of having committed or attempted a crime;

(iii)

While assisting a person against whom a crime has been committed or attempted if the assistance was rendered in a reasonable manner; or

(iv)

While attempting to prevent the commission of a crime.

(B)

In the case of a victim or crime victim:

(i)

That is an institutional entity, the term “victim” or “crime victim” includes an authorized representative of the entity.

(ii)

Who is under 18 years of age, incompetent, incapacitated, or deceased, the term “victim” or “crime victim” includes a representative appointed by the court to exercise the rights and receive the services set forth in this chapter on behalf of the victim.

(C)

The term “victim” shall not include any person who committed or aided or abetted in the commission of the crime.

History

June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 302(b), 47 DCR 7039
Nov. 6, 2010, D.C. Law 18-259, § 2(b), 57 DCR 5591
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 107(b), 60 DCR 3390

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-259 redesignated existing par. (1) as (1B); and added pars. (1) and (1A).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-320 deleted “violent” preceding “misdemeanor” in (2)(A)(i).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of (2)(A)(i), see § 107(b) of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 107(b) of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).